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DTC B0 105/53 Short in P Squib Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−2.
DTC B0105/53 is recorded when a short is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0105/53
SShort circuit inPsquibwireharness
SPsquibmalfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SFrontpassengerairbagassembly (Psquib)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SWireharness
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI−549)

2 Check P squib circuit.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the front
passenger airbag assembly and the airbag sensor assembly.
CHECK:
For the connector (on the front passenger airbag assembly
side) between the front passenger airbag assembly and the air-
bag sensor assembly, measure the resistance between P+ and
P−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween front passenger airbag assembly and air-
bag sensor assembly.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect P+ and P− of the connector

(on the front passenger airbag assembly side) between
the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger air-
bag assembly.

(c) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(b) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(c) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(d) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(e) Check DTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 105/53 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0105/53 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check P squib.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect negative (−) terminal cable from the battery,

and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
(d) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOOK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(b) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(c) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(d) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(e) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(f) Check DTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 105/53 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0105/53 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace front passenger airbag assembly.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.


